Wisconsin, session 2025, SB604.
do enact as follows:SB604,11Section 1. 115.28 (7) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,2,122115.28 (7) (b) Subject to the same rules and laws concerning qualifications of 3applicants and granting and revocation of licenses or certificates under par. (a), the 4state superintendent shall grant certificates and licenses to teachers in private 5schools and tribal schools, except that teaching experience requirements for such 6certificates and licenses may be fulfilled by teaching experience in public, private, 7or tribal schools. An applicant is not eligible for a license or certificate unless the 8state superintendent finds that the private school or tribal school in which the 9applicant taught offered an adequate educational program during the period of the 10applicant’s teaching therein. Private Except as provided under ss. 115.7915 (2) (i), 11118.60 (2) (a) 6m., and 119.23 (2) (a) 6m., private schools are not obligated to employ 12only licensed or certified teachers.SB604,213Section 2. 115.7915 (2) (i) of the statutes is created to read:SB604,3,314115.7915 (2) (i) 1. Except as provided in subd. 3., beginning on July 1, 2027, 15all of the eligible school’s teachers have a teaching license or permit issued by the 1department, except that a teacher employed by the eligible school who teaches only 2courses in rabbinical studies is not required to hold a license or permit to teach 3issued by the department.SB604,3,542. Except as provided in subd. 3., beginning on July 1, 2027, all of the eligible 5school’s administrators have an administrator’s license issued by the department.SB604,3,1563. Any teacher or administrator employed by the eligible school on July 1, 72027, who has been teaching or employed as an administrator for at least the 5 8consecutive years immediately preceding July 1, 2027, and who does not satisfy the 9requirements under subd. 1. or 2. on July 1, 2027, applies to the department on a 10form prepared by the department for a temporary, nonrenewable waiver from the 11requirements under subd. 1. or 2. The department shall promulgate rules to 12implement this subdivision, including the form of the application and the process by 13which the waiver application will be reviewed. The application form shall require 14the applicant to submit a plan for satisfying the requirements under subd. 1. No 15waiver granted under this subdivision is valid after July 1, 2032.SB604,316Section 3. 118.19 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,3,2217118.19 (1) Except as provided in subs. (1b) and (1c) and s. 118.40 (8) (b) 1. and 182., any person seeking to teach in a public school, including a charter school, or in a 19school or institution operated by a county or the state, in a private school 20participating in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or in a private 21school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 shall first procure a license 22or permit from the department.SB604,423Section 4. 118.19 (1b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,4,61118.19 (1b) An individual may teach an online course in a subject and level in 2a public school, including a charter school, in a private school participating in a 3parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or in a private school 4participating in the program under s. 115.7915 without a license or permit from the 5department if the individual holds a valid license or permit to teach the subject and 6level in the state from which the online course is provided.SB604,57Section 5. 118.19 (1c) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,4,148118.19 (1c) (b) (intro.) A faculty member of an institution of higher education 9may teach in a public high school, including a charter school that operates only high 10school grades, in a private school participating in a parental choice program under 11s. 118.60 or 119.23 that operates only high school grades, or in a private school 12participating in the program under s. 115.7915 that operates only high school 13grades without a license or permit from the department if the faculty member 14satisfies all of the following:SB604,615Section 6. 118.19 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,5,1616118.19 (3) (a) No license to teach in any public school may be issued unless the 17applicant possesses a bachelor’s degree including such professional training as the 18department by rule requires, except as permitted under par. (b) and ss. 115.28 (17) 19(a), 118.191, 118.1915, 118.192, 118.193, 118.194, and 118.197. Notwithstanding s. 2036.11 (16), no teacher preparatory program in this state may be approved by the 21state superintendent under s. 115.28 (7) (a), unless each student in the program is 22required to complete student teaching consisting of full days for a full semester 23following the daily schedule and semester calendar of the cooperating school or the 1equivalent, as determined by the state superintendent. No license to teach in any 2public school may be granted to an applicant who completed a professional training 3program outside this state unless the applicant completed student teaching 4consisting of full days for a full semester following the daily schedule and semester 5calendar of the cooperating school or the equivalent, as determined by the state 6superintendent. The state superintendent may grant exceptions to the student 7teaching requirements under this paragraph when the midyear calendars of the 8institution offering the teacher preparatory program and the cooperating school 9differ from each other and would prevent students from attending classes at the 10institution in accordance with the institution’s calendar. The state superintendent 11shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection. If for the purpose of granting 12a license to teach or for approving a teacher preparatory program the state 13superintendent requires that an institution of higher education be accredited, the 14state superintendent shall accept accreditation by a regional or national 15institutional accrediting agency recognized by the U.S. department of education or 16by a programmatic accrediting organization.SB604,717Section 7. 118.19 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,6,418118.19 (3) (b) The state superintendent shall permanently certify any 19applicant to teach Wisconsin native American languages and culture who has 20successfully completed the university of Wisconsin-Milwaukee school of education 21approved Wisconsin native American languages and culture project certification 22program at any time between January 1, 1974, and December 31, 1977. School 23districts shall A school district, the governing body of a private school participating 1in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or the governing body of a 2private school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 may not assign 3individuals certified under this paragraph to teach courses other than Wisconsin 4native American languages and culture, unless they qualify under par. (a).SB604,85Section 8. 118.19 (10) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,6,96118.19 (10) (b) 1. Conduct a background investigation of each applicant for 7issuance or renewal of a license or permit, including a license or permit issued to a 8pupil services professional, and for a faculty member seeking to teach in a public 9high school without a license or permit.SB604,910Section 9. 118.191 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,6,2011118.191 (2) (a) Notwithstanding s. 118.19 (7) to (9), the department shall 12grant an initial teaching license to teach a technical education subject to an 13individual who is eligible for licensure under s. 118.19 (4) and (10), who scores at 14least 100 points on the point system under sub. (5), of which at least 25 points are 15from sub. (5) (a) 1. and at least 25 points are from sub. (5) (a) 2., and who agrees to 16complete during the term of the license a curriculum determined by the school 17board of the school district, by the governing body of the private school participating 18in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or by the governing body of 19the private school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 in which the 20individual will teach.SB604,1021Section 10. 118.191 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,7,822118.191 (2) (b) Notwithstanding s. 118.19 (7) to (9), the department shall 23grant an initial teaching license to teach a vocational education subject to an 1individual who is eligible for licensure under s. 118.19 (4) and (10), who scores at 2least 100 points on the point system under sub. (5m), of which at least 25 points are 3from sub. (5m) (a) 1. and at least 25 points are from sub. (5m) (a) 2., and who agrees 4to complete during the term of the license a curriculum determined by the school 5board of the school district, by the governing body of the private school participating 6in a parental choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or by the governing body of 7the private school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 in which the 8individual will teach.SB604,119Section 11. 118.191 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,7,1310118.191 (2m) An initial teaching license issued under sub. (2) authorizes an 11individual to teach only in the school district controlled by the school board, or in 12the private school controlled by the governing body, that determined the curriculum 13the individual agreed to complete in order to qualify for the initial teaching license.SB604,1214Section 12. 118.191 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,7,1815118.191 (3) An initial teaching license issued under sub. (2) is valid for 3 16years. An initial teaching license issued under sub. (2) is void if the license holder 17ceases to be employed as a teacher in the school district or private school in which 18the license holder is authorized to teach under sub. (2m).SB604,1319Section 13. 118.191 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,8,720118.191 (4) Upon the expiration of the 3-year term of an initial teaching 21license issued under sub. (2), the department shall issue to the license holder a 22professional teaching license to teach the technical education subject or vocational 23education subject if the individual successfully completed the curriculum that the 1individual agreed to under sub. (2), as determined by the school board of the school 2district, by the governing body of the private school participating in a parental 3choice program under s. 118.60 or 119.23, or by the governing body of the private 4school participating in the program under s. 115.7915 that established the 5curriculum. The department shall indicate on a professional teaching license 6issued under this subsection that the license was obtained under the experience-7based licensure program under this section.SB604,148Section 14. 118.192 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,8,129118.192 (4) A school board or private school participating in a parental choice 10program under s. 118.60 or 119.23 that employs a person who holds a professional 11teaching permit shall ensure that no regularly licensed teacher is removed from his 12or her position as a result of the employment of persons holding permits.SB604,1513Section 15. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,8,1814118.60 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c. and d., all of the private 15school’s teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s 16degree or a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, 17including a masters master’s or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited 18institution of higher education. This subd. 6. a. does not apply after June 30, 2027.SB604,1619Section 16. 118.60 (2) (a) 6. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,8,2320118.60 (2) (a) 6. b. All of the private school’s administrators have at least a 21bachelor’s degree from a nationally or regionally accredited institution of higher 22education or a teaching license or administrator’s license issued by the department. 23This subd. 6. b. does not apply after June 30, 2027.SB604,171Section 17. 118.60 (2) (a) 6m. of the statutes is created to read:SB604,9,42118.60 (2) (a) 6m. a. Except as provided in subd. 6m. c., beginning on July 1, 32027, all of the private school’s teachers have a teaching license or permit issued by 4the department.SB604,9,75b. Except as provided in subd. 6m. c., beginning on July 1, 2027, all of the 6private school’s administrators have an administrator’s license issued by the 7department.SB604,9,178c. Any teacher or administrator employed by the private school on July 1, 92027, who has been teaching or employed as an administrator for at least the 5 10consecutive years immediately preceding July 1, 2027, and who does not satisfy the 11requirements under subd. 6m. a. or b. on July 1, 2027, applies to the department on 12a form prepared by the department for a temporary, nonrenewable waiver from the 13requirements under subd. 6m. a. or b. The department shall promulgate rules to 14implement this subd. 6m. c., including the form of the application and the process 15by which the waiver application will be reviewed. The application form shall 16require the applicant to submit a plan for satisfying the requirements under subd. 176m. a. or b. No waiver granted under this subd. 6m. c. is valid after July 1, 2032.SB604,1818Section 18. 118.60 (2) (c) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB604,9,2219118.60 (2) (c) 3. Notwithstanding par. (a) 6m., a teacher employed by a private 20school participating in the program under this section who teaches only courses in 21rabbinical studies is not required to hold a license or permit to teach issued by the 22department.SB604,1923Section 19. 118.60 (2) (c) 4. of the statutes is created to read:SB604,10,41118.60 (2) (c) 4. Notwithstanding par. (a) 6m., an administrator of a private 2school participating in the program under this section that prepares and trains 3pupils attending the school in rabbinical studies is not required to hold an 4administrator’s license issued by the department.SB604,205Section 20. 119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB604,10,106119.23 (2) (a) 6. a. Except as provided in subd. 6. c., all of the private school’s 7teachers have a teaching license issued by the department or a bachelor’s degree or 8a degree or educational credential higher than a bachelor’s degree, including a 9masters master’s or doctorate, from a nationally or regionally accredited institution 10of higher education. This subd. 6. a. does not apply after June 30, 2027. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb604 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb604 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB604 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB604 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB604: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting